da: Monteringstype for bremseskive: 6-bolt; Center Lock; Ingen skivemontering; Andet
el: Τύπος στερέωσης δίσκου φρένου: 6 μπουλόνια; Center Lock; Χωρίς βάση δισκόπλακας; Άλλο
fi: Jarrulevyn kiinnitystyyppi: 6-pulttinen; Center Lock; Ei levykiinnikettä; Muu
hu: Féktárcsa rögzítési típusa: 6 csavaros; Center Lock; Féktárcsarögzítés nélküli; Egyéb
nb: Monteringstype for bremserotor: 6-bolt; Center Lock; Ingen rotorfeste; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de suporte do disco do travão: 6 parafusos; Center Lock; Sem montagem de rotor; Outro
de: Befestigungstyp der Bremsscheibe: 6-Loch; Center Lock; Keine Bremsscheibenaufnahme; Sonstige
zh-CN: 刹车盘安装类型: 6 螺栓; Center Lock; 无刹车盘底座; 其他
vi: Kiểu ngàm gắn đĩa phanh: 6 bu-lông; Center Lock; Không có ngàm gắn rô-to; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem do disco de freio: 6 parafusos; Center Lock; Sem montagem de disco; Outro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งจานเบรก: 6 รู; เซ็นเตอร์ล็อก; ไม่มียึดจานเบรก; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de montaje de rotor de freno: 6 tornillos; Center Lock; Sin soporte de rotor; Otro
cs: Typ uchycení brzdového kotouče: 6 šroubů; Center Lock; Bez upevnění kotouče; Jiné
tr: Fren diski montaj tipi: 6 cıvatalı; Merkez kilit; Rotor montajı yok; Diğer
fr: Type de fixation du disque de frein: 6 boulons; Center Lock; Sans support de disque; Autre
ru: Тип крепления тормозного ротора: 6 болтов; Center Lock; Без крепления ротора; Другое
it: Tipo di montaggio del disco freno: 6 bulloni; Center Lock; Nessun attacco per disco; Altro
bg-BG: Тип монтаж на спирачния ротор: С 6 болта; Center Lock; Без монтаж на ротор; Други
pl: Typ mocowania tarczy hamulcowej: Na 6 śrub; Center Lock; Brak mocowania tarczy; Inne
en: Brake rotor mount type: 6-bolt; Center Lock; No rotor mount; Other
sv: Typ av bromsskivor: 6-bults; Center Lock; Inget rotorfäste; Övrigt
lt-LT: Stabdžių rotorių montavimo tipas: 6 varžtų; „Center Lock“; Be rotoriaus tvirtinimo; Kitas
ko: 브레이크 로터 장착 유형: 6볼트; 센터 락; 로터 마운트 없음; 기타
nl: Type remschijfbevestiging: 6-bouts; Center Lock; Geen remschijfbevestiging; Overig
zh-TW: 煞車碟盤安裝類型: 6 螺栓; 中心鎖入; 無煞車盤底座; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de montare al rotorului de frână: Cu 6 șuruburi; Center Lock; Fără montare pentru disc; Altele
ja: ブレーキローターマウントタイプ: 6ボルト; センターロック; ローターマウントなし; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta nosilca zavornega koluta: 6 vijakov; Center Lock; Brez nosilca za rotor; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia rotora brzdy: 6 skrutiek; Center Lock; Bez uchytenia kotúča; Iný
hr-HR: Vrsta nosača za kočni rotor: Sa 6 vijaka; Center Lock; Bez nosača diska; Ostalo